el: Μέθοδος αγκύρωσης βάσης: Με κλιπ; Επίπεδη; Ταινία hook and loop (Velcro); Μαγνητική; Κανένα; Πάσσαλος; Με καρφιά; Πάσσαλος; Με βεντούζα; Με βάρος; Άλλο
hu: Alaprögzítési módszer: Felcsíptethető; Lapos; Tépőzáras; Mágneses; Nincs; Cövek; Tüskés; Karó; Tapadókorongos; Súlyozott; Egyéb
en: Base anchoring method: Clip-on; Flat; Hook and loop; Magnetic; None; Peg; Spiked; Stake; Suction; Weighted; Other
cs: Způsob ukotvení základny: Násuvné; Plochá; Suchý zip; Magnetické; Žádný; Kolík; S hrotem; Zápich; Přísavka; Zatížené; Jiné
es: Método de anclaje de la base: Con clip; Plano; Gancho y bucle; Magnético; Ninguno; Clavija; Con púas; Estaca; Succión; Con peso; Otro
vi: Phương pháp neo đế: Dạng kẹp; Phẳng; Băng gai dính; Nam châm; Không có; Chốt; Đinh gai; Cọc; Đế hít; Gia trọng; Khác
sl-SI: Metoda pritrditve baze: Na priponko; Ravna; Ježek; Magnetno; Brez; Klin; S konico; Količek; Prisesek; Obteženo; Drugo
lt-LT: Pagrindo tvirtinimo metodas: Prisegamas; Plokščias; Kibioji juosta; Magnetinis; Nėra; Smeigtukas; Su spygliais; Kuoliukas; Prisiurbiamas; Su svoriu; Kita
ja: 土台固定方法: クリップオン; フラット; 面ファスナー; マグネット式; なし; ペグ; スパイク式; ステーク; 吸盤; 重り付き; その他
sv: Basförankringsmetod: Klämma; Platt; Kardborre; Magnetisk; Ingen; Tapp; Med piggar; Markpinne; Sugpropp; Tyngdförsedd; Övrigt
bg-BG: Метод за закрепване на основата: С щипка; Плосък; Велкро; Магнитен; Няма; Колче; С шип; Кол; Вакуум; С тежест; Друго
sk-SK: Metóda ukotvenia základne: Pripínacia; Plochá; Suchý zips; Magnetická; Žiadna; Kolík; Ostroha; Zápich; Prísavka; Zaťažená; Iná
th: วิธีการยึดฐานกับพื้น: แบบหนีบ; แบบแบน; ตีนตุ๊กแก; แม่เหล็ก; ไม่มี; หมุดยึด; หนามแหลม; สมอบก; จุกดูดสุญญากาศ; ถ่วงน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Método de ancoragem da base: Com clipe; Plano; Fixador de contato; Magnético; Nenhum; Pino; Com estacas; Estaca; Sucção; Com peso; Outros
zh-CN: 垒垫固定方法: 夹扣式; 平底式; 魔术贴; 磁吸式; 无; 地钉式; 钉刺式; 木桩式; 吸盘式; 配重式; 其他
it: Metodo di ancoraggio di base: A clip; Piatto; Chiusura a strappo; Magnetico; Nessuno; Piolo; A spuntone; Picchetto; A ventosa; Zavorrato; Altro
nb: Metode for forankring av base: Klips; Flat; Borrelås; Magnetisk; Ingen; Plugg; Pigger; Jordspyd; Sugekopp; Vektet; Annet
tr: Taban sabitleme yöntemi: Klipsli; Düz; Cırt cırt; Manyetik; Yok; Kazık; Çivili; Çivi; Vantuz; Ağırlıklı; Diğer
ko: 받침대 고정 방식: 클립온; 플랫; 후크 앤 루프; 마그네틱; 없음; 페그; 스파이크; 말뚝; 흡착식; 웨이트형; 기타
de: Sockelverankerung: Zum Anklippen; Flach; Klettverschluss; Magnetisch; Keine; Verankerungsstift; Mit Spikes; Pflock; Saugnapf; Beschwert; Sonstige
pt-PT: Método de ancoragem da base: De encaixe; Plano; Fita autoaderente; Magnético; Nenhum; Cavilha; Espigado; Estaca; Sucção; Com pesos; Outro
da: Metode til forankring af base: Clip-on; Flad; Burrebånd; Magnetisk; Ingen; Pløk; Med pigge; Pæl; Sugekop; Vægtet; Andet
fr: Système de fixation de la base: À pince; Plat; Bande autoagrippante; Magnétique; Aucun; Cheville; À pointes; Piquet; Ventouse; Lesté; Autre
fi: Alustan kiinnitysmenetelmä: Klipsikiinnitys; Litteä; Tarranauha; Magneettinen; Ei mitään; Tappi; Piikki; Maakiila; Imukuppi; Painotettu; Muu
ru: Способ крепления основания: На защелках; Плоское; Липучка; Магнитное; Нет; Колышки; Шипы; Колья; Присоски; С утяжелителем; Другое
hr-HR: Metoda sidrenja baze: Na kopču; Ravno; Na čičak; Magnetno; Ništa; Klin; Sa šiljcima; Klin za zemlju; Na vakuum; S utegom; Ostalo
ro-RO: Metoda de ancorare a bazei: Cu clemă; Plat; Sistem velcro; Magnetic; Fără; Cârlig de fixare; Cu țepi; Țăruș; Ventuze; Lestat; Altele
pl: Metoda kotwiczenia podstawy: Na klips; Płaski; Rzep; Magnetyczny; Brak; Na kołek; Z kolcem; Śledź; Przyssawka; Obciążony; Inny
zh-TW: 底座錨固方式: 夾式; 平坦; 魔鬼氈; 磁吸; 無; 掛釘; 帶釘; 地樁; 吸盤; 加重; 其他
nl: Voet verankeringsmethode: Opklikbaar; Plat; Klittenband; Magnetisch; Geen; Pen; Met spikes; Grondpen; Zuignap; Verzwaard; Overig